ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
# ispell affix file for estonian. 
# 
# autogenerated with rulegen.pl Mon Jun  2 07:15:04 2003
# Linux themis 2.4.18-27.8.0 #1 Fri Mar 14 06:45:49 EST 2003 i686 i686 i386 GNU/Linux

# 
# http://www.meso.ee/~jjpp/speller/
# jjpp@meso.ee
# 

compoundwords on
allaffixes on
compoundmin 2

defstringtype "dict" "nroff" ".dict"
wordchars [a-z] [A-Z]
wordchars ä Ä
wordchars õ Õ
wordchars ö Ö
wordchars ü Ü
wordchars ð Ð
wordchars þ Þ
wordchars [-] [-]
boundarychars [-] [-]


# tex'i teisendusreeglite koht. need tulevad siia kunagi hiljem.

# suffiksid
suffixes


# rule/flag 1 (affects 97897 words, has 52 subrules):
flag a:
	U	>	B
	U	>	BKI
	U	>	DKI
	[AELMNR]	>	GI
	[DST]	>	KI
	U	>	KSID
	U	>	KSIDKI
	U	>	KSIME
	U	>	KSIMEGI
	U	>	KSIN
	U	>	KSINGI
	U	>	KSITE
	U	>	KSITEGI
	U	>	KSKI
	K	>	KU
	K	>	KUGI
	K	>	KUSID
	K	>	KUSIDKI
	U	>	ME
	U	>	MEGI
	U	>	N
	U	>	NGI
	I	>	TA
	I	>	TAGI
	I	>	TAGU
	I	>	TAGUGI
	I	>	TAKS
	I	>	TAKSE
	I	>	TAKSEGI
	I	>	TAKSKI
	I	>	TAMA
	I	>	TAMAGI
	I	>	TAV
	I	>	TAVGI
	I	>	TAVUS
	I	>	TAVUSKI
	I	>	TAVUSSE
	I	>	TAVUSSEGI
	I	>	TAVUST
	I	>	TAVUSTKI
	U	>	TE
	U	>	TEGI
	I	>	TI
	I	>	TIGI
	V	>	US
	V	>	USKI
	V	>	USSE
	V	>	USSEGI
	V	>	UST
	V	>	USTKI
	U	>	VAD
	U	>	VADKI
