ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
aastasusega/abehklmny
abortiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
adenoomega/almny
advokatuur/a
aetavusiga/ajly
agnostikuga/abcdefgikmoy
ahendus/arsuw
ahvilikega/ajlmny
ainulisusiga/ajly
ajuriga/abcehijlmoy
aktivist/a
akveduktega/almny
albumeiga/acejl
algulisega/abdhjlmny
allikalisusega/abehklmny
alumik/auw
ametkond/a
amorfsusega/abehklmny
analfabeet/asuw
andestusiga/ajly
aniliiniga/acefijkly
anskopega/almn
antrekoodega/almn
apendiks/a
apologeetilisega/abdhjlmny
arastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
arglemisega/abhlmny
aristokraatlikuga/acdegjlmy
armuga/acdeghimy
artillerist/a
arvutiga/abcehijlmoy
asine/aqr
assimilatsioonega/almny
astrik/auw
atavistlik/auw
atoonilistega/almny
aulega/almny
autoga/aily
avalustega/almny
baikaga/abcdfghiky
baltlusega/abehiklmny
baromeetrilisega/abdhjlmny
bekarr/a
bigaamilisusiga/ajly
biograafilistega/almny
blond/a
bonifikatsiooniga/acefijkly
brigaadsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
bubooniline/aqrt
butaan/a
danaoslane/aqt
defitsiitne/a
dekompressioon/a
demonstrandega/almn
desertöör/a
detonatsioonilisega/abdhjlmny
dialektismiga/acefijkly
diftongilisega/abdhjlmny
disketiga/aceijly
dokitavusiga/ajly
druşinnikuga/abcdefgikmoy
edasistega/almny
egiptlastega/almny
eksekutiivsustega/almny
ekspositsioonilisiga/ajlny
elavdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
emba/aqrstu
enharmooniline/aqrt
episood/a
erksus/arsuw
essentsisusiga/ajly
euroopalisiga/ajlny
falsifikatsioon/a
fenoplastiga/acefijkly
finiitsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
fookuselisusiga/ajly
fransseesiga/acefijkly
följetonist/a
gastronoomega/almny
gjauriga/acefijkly
graniitsusega/abehklmny
haakel/a
haigutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hallatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
happelisega/abdhjlmny
haruldastega/almny
hegelianismega/almny
helgatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hemolüütilisustega/almny
hiiglaslikega/ajlmny
hinnakaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
holoppidega/almny
hooviga/acefijkly
huligaansusiga/ajly
häbelik/auw
härmistunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hõivatustega/almny
hüdroksiid/a
hüsteerilisega/abdhjlmny
iganenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
iisraellane/aqt
ilutsustega/almny
impressiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
infinitiivega/almny
innukusiga/ajly
internetiga/aceijly
iriidiumeiga/acejl
istungeiga/acejl
jahvardeiga/acejl
jeekimiga/abcehijlmoy
jooniline/aqrt
juhuslikkustega/almny
juudalasega/abhilmny
jäljenduslikkudega/almny
jäss/a
jõnkslemisega/abhlmny
kaalustamatus/arsuw
kabistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kaftan/a
kahvakaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
kalasustega/almny
kallim/aw
kanaleiga/acejl
kantiaanlikkudega/almny
karaiimega/almny
karisega/abdehjklmnoy
karulikkudega/almny
kasutatavustega/almny
kats/a
kautğukiga/abcehijlmoy
keerem/aw
keigarlikkudega/almny
keraamilisusega/abehklmny
kesvasustega/almny
kihistustega/almny
kiipsakus/arsuw
kildkondlikkudega/almny
kindlustis/arsuw
kirglikkudega/almny
kistavusega/abehklmny
kivitisiga/ajly
kliine/aqr
klähviga/acefijkly
koelisusega/abehklmny
kohesusega/abehklmny
kokainist/a
kollegiaalsus/arsuw
komberdustega/almny
kompetentsusega/abehiklmny
kondilisustega/almny
konsekutiivne/ar
kontinuiteedega/almn
koogitavustega/almny
koorelisusiga/ajly
kordajaga/abcdefgikmnoy
korralistega/almny
kosmoloogiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kraavitusega/abhilmny
kribinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kriugastega/almny
kruugiga/aceijly
kude/a
kukumaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
kumerikega/ajlmny
kuraasikusiga/ajly
kurvastusiga/ajly
kuuljusega/abehklmny
kvassiga/acefijkly
käiviteiga/ajl
kärjelisusega/abehklmny
käuksatustega/almny
kõhnusiga/ajly
kõlususiga/ajly
kõrkus/arsuw
kõõvits/a
küki/arsuw
kündidega/almny
küürutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lademik/auw
lahitsaga/abcdefgikmnoy
laimdustega/almny
lambitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
lapselisusiga/ajly
laudiga/abcehijlmoy
leegiga/aceijly
lehka/aqrstu
leksikaalsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
lepistik/auw
lift/a
liiderlikuga/acdegjlmy
liitrilisiga/ajlny
linlik/auw
liuelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
loibadega/almny
longanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
loomulisega/abdhjlmny
lugejaskond/a
lupsunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lähestikususega/abehklmny
lärtsunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lõhnakusiga/ajly
lõpetamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
lödisusega/abehklmny
lülilisiga/ajlny
madalalt/a
mahlakaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
makega/almn
mandrilisustega/almny
marjandusiga/ajly
massilisusiga/ajly
meeldivusega/abehklmny
meigas/auw
merisusega/abehklmny
metsanduslikuga/acdegjlmy
miljonär/a
mitmestega/almny
monitorega/almny
morfinismiga/acefijkly
muie/a
munalisiga/ajlny
musliin/a
mädajusega/abehklmny
märgistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mõhaga/abcfiky
mõrkamisega/abhlmny
möllusustega/almny
mürtsutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
naeratus/arsuw
naljatustega/almny
nauditavustega/almny
neoliitiline/aqrt
niietusega/abhilmny
nirakus/arsuw
nonparell/a
notariaadega/almn
nuputanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nägemisega/abhilmny
näokusiga/ajly
nääpsjusiga/ajly
nõtkatusega/abhilmny
nürinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ohmasusiga/ajly
oktavistiga/acefijkly
ongströmeiga/acejl
oraakellikega/ajlmny
orjuslasiga/ajly
osteotsüüt/asuw
paatjusiga/ajly
pahurdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pakett/asuw
palistusiga/ajly
pankaline/aqrt
parajusega/abehiklmny
paroodilisustega/almny
pastorlik/auw
peaga/abcfhiky
peetavusiga/ajly
pendleiga/acejl
pertussiinega/almny
pietistlik/auw
piimjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
pikkususega/abehklmny
pime/a
piraatlusega/abehiklmny
plaanitsus/arsuw
pleebs/a
plõks/a
polituuriga/acefijkly
poodnikega/almny
port/asuw
pragmaatilisusega/abehklmny
present/asuw
privilegeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pronksisusega/abehklmny
protsessinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
psühhiaatrilisega/abdhjlmny
puhmalisiga/ajlny
pullover/a
purgituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
putkjusega/abehklmny
päikeselisusiga/ajly
pätiga/aceijly
põimendus/arsuw
põrgatus/arsuw
pööritavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
püttidega/almny
rabinal/a
rahvastikega/almny
rammetuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
rasususiga/ajly
reastikkudega/almny
regeneratiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
rekvisiitoreiga/acejl
representatsioon/a
retsidiiviga/acefijkly
rihmikuga/abcdefgikmoy
rimanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ristilisustega/almny
rohustega/almny
roojasusiga/ajly
rudimentaarsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
rutulistega/almny
rändur/a
rõngalisiga/ajlny
rööplik/auw
rüüstega/abcefhiklmny
sabinal/a
sajatavusiga/ajly
salpeetrisusiga/ajly
santiimiga/acefijkly
satiiriline/aqrt
seemnelisiga/ajlny
seisuga/acdeghimy
selgmisusiga/ajly
sensuaalsusega/abehklmny
servmisustega/almny
sigidusiga/ajly
siivsustega/almny
simulant/asuw
sirmjus/arsuw
skalaarsustega/almny
slovakega/almn
solgitavustega/almny
soojumusega/abhilmny
sopasusega/abehklmny
spagaatidega/almny
spurditavusiga/ajly
stereomeetrilistega/almny
striptiisiga/acefijkly
sugulisus/arsuw
sulestikuga/acdegimy
sunniit/asuw
suuda/arsy
säde/a
säärasustega/almny
sõlmitusiga/ajly
sõõn/a
sügavalt/a
sündmustikulisustega/almny
süstoleiga/acejl
taatlustega/almny
tahtelisega/abdhjlmny
taktiilsustega/almny
tamariskega/almny
tapnud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tasemustega/almny
teatreiga/acejl
tehtega/abehiklmny
teljelistega/almny
teraapilisega/abdhjlmny
tervistustega/almny
tiirlemisiga/ajly
tinasustega/almny
toetusega/abehiklmny
tollasega/abdehjklmnoy
toonilisega/abdhjlmny
tormisusiga/ajly
trahheiga/acejl
treivusega/abehklmny
triumvir/a
trükkinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tsitrusega/abehiklmny
tuhkjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
tulemeiga/acejl
tungle/asuw
turrusega/abehklmny
tuuritanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
täiusiga/ajly
täägiga/aceijly
tõmbus/arsuw
tõuklevusega/abehklmny
töötavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
tünjus/arsuw
udustustega/almny
ujutatavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
universaalne/ar
usuaalne/ar
vaakumeiga/acejl
vaevastega/almny
vahustus/arsuw
vaktsiin/a
vallatlenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vankunud/afijklmnopqrstuvwyz
varieteet/asuw
vastastega/almny
veerandik/auw
velpustega/almny
verstasustega/almny
vihane/aqr
viimatistega/almny
vikkel/a
villane/aqr
viperusega/abhilmny
visklejaga/abcdefgkmnoy
volitusiga/ajly
vormunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vägisustega/almny
väljas/a
värvituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
võidetavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
võlgnevusiga/ajly
võrgutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vürstitarega/almny
ärastiga/abcehijlmoy
ğamanismega/almny
õelikuga/acdegjlmy
õilsusega/abehiklmny
õppamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
öördavusiga/ajly
ülbusega/abehiklmny
üürike/a
